src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON x_12_pl ! nuoret
  +Pl      :^WG         nom_t           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2i    gen_n           ;
  +Pl:                  gen_ten         ; ! kielten, both Por and Var
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:%>i2    gen_tten        ; ! kielitten, sienitten
  +Pl+Dial/Var:%>i2    gen_tten        ; ! kielitten, sienitten
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2     par_V           ; ! kielii, pienii
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:%>i2    par_A           ; ! kieliä, pieniä
  +Pl+Dial/Var:%>i2    par_A           ; ! kieliä, pieniä
  +Pl      :^HMETA      ill_hiin        ;
  +Pl      :%>i2        ess_nA          ;
  +Pl      :%>i2        com_ne          ;
  +Pl      :%>i2        sgpl_cases_even ; !! * @CODE@  for same affix in sg and pl

LEXICON n_12_hi        !!= @CODE@  lohi, tuohi, riihi
+N         :     x_12_hi ;
+N+Sg      :^E2I nom_R   ; ! ^E2I e to i

LEXICON x_12_hi 
  +Sg      :^E2I        nom_end         ; ! ^E2I e to i
  +Sg      :^EDEL       par_tA          ;
  +Sg      :^WG         gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg      :^WG         sgpl_cases_even ; !! * @CODE@  for same affix in sg and pl
  +Sg      :            ess_nA          ;
  +Sg      :^HMETA      ill_hVVn        ;

  +Pl      :^WG         nom_t           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2i    gen_n           ; ! lohhiin
  +Pl         :%>i2     gen_tten        ; ! lohitten
  +Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2     par_V           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:%>i2    par_A           ; 
  +Pl+Dial/Var:%>i2    par_A           ; 
  +Pl      :^HMETA      ill_hiin        ;
  +Pl      :%>i2        ess_nA          ;
  +Pl      :%>i2        com_ne          ;
  +Pl      :%>i2        sgpl_cases_even ; !! * @CODE@  for same affix in sg and pl
  !     +Pl:%>i2        gen_Vn          ;
  !    !+Pl:^EDEL       gen_ten         ;

LEXICON n_12_mi       !!= @CODE@ lumi lu
+N         :   x_12_mi ;
+N+Sg      :mi nom_R       ; ! ^EI e to i

LEXICON x_12_mi
  +Sg      :mi           nom_end         ; ! ^EI e to i
  +Sg      :me^WG        gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg      :n            par_tA          ;
  +Sg      :me^HMETA     ill_hVVn        ; ! e is for vowel copying, then e:0
  +Sg      :me           ess_nA          ;
  +Sg      :me^WG        sgpl_cases_even ; ! these two lexica for cases with

  +Pl      :me^WG        nom_t           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:me%>i2       gen_Vn          ; ! lumiin
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:m%>i2        gen_tten        ; ! lumitten
  +Pl+Dial/Var:m%>i2        gen_tten        ; ! lumitten
  +Pl+Dial/Por:me%>i2       par_V           ; ! lumii
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:me%>i2       par_A           ; ! lumia
  +Pl+Dial/Var:me%>i2       par_A           ; ! lumia
  +Pl      :m^EDEL       ill_hiin        ;
  +Pl      :me%>i2       ess_nA          ;
  +Pl      :m%>i2        com_ne          ; ! kanskje me
  +Pl      :m^WG%>i2     sgpl_cases_even ; ! the same affix in sg and pl


LEXICON n_12_si        !!= @CODE@ käsi, hirsi
+N+Dial/Por       :^Por     x_12_si ;
+N+Dial/Var       :^Var     x_12_si_var ;
+N+Dial/Jok       :^Jok     x_12_si ;
+N+Sg      : nom_R     ;

LEXICON x_12_si ! uusi
  +Sg      :^E2I     nom_end         ;
!                       nomgen_px       ; ! sg nom/gen px
  +Sg      :^WG      gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg      :^EDEL    par_tA          ; ! parsg
  +Sg      :^HMETA   ill_hVVn        ;
  +Sg      :         ess_nA          ;
  +Sg+Err/Orth:      ess_nnA         ; 
  +Sg      :^WG      sgpl_cases_even ; ! these two lexica for cases with

  +Pl      :^WG      nom_t           ;
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^E2I%>i2 gen_Vn          ; ! vuossiin, ei vuottiin, hirssiin
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:%>i2     gen_tten        ; !hirssitten, vuossitten
  +Pl+Dial/Var:%>i2     gen_tten        ; !hirssitten, vuossitten
  +Pl+Dial/Por:^E2I%>i2 par_V           ; ! hirssii
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:%>i2     par_A           ; ! hirsiä
  +Pl+Dial/Var:%>i2     par_A           ; ! hirsiä
  +Pl      :^HMETA    ill_hiin        ;
  +Pl      :^E2I%>i2    ess_nA          ;
  +Pl      :^E2I%>i2    com_ne          ;
  +Pl      :^E2I%>i2    sgpl_cases_even ; ! the same affix in sg and pl

  LEXICON x_12_si_var ! uusi
    +Sg      :^E2I     nom_end         ;
  !                       nomgen_px       ; ! sg nom/gen px
    +Sg      :^WG      gen_n_sg        ;
    +Sg      :^WG^UU   gen_n_sg        ;
    +Sg      :^WG^TJ   gen_n_sg        ;
    +Sg      :^EDEL    par_tA          ; ! parsg
    +Sg      :^HMETA   ill_hVVn        ;
    +Sg      :         ess_nA          ;
    
    +Sg      :^WG      sgpl_cases_even ; ! these two lexica for cases with
    +Sg      :^WG^UU   sgpl_cases_even ; ! these two lexica for cases with
    +Sg      :^WG^TJ   sgpl_cases_even ; ! these two lexica for cases with

    +Pl      :^WG      nom_t           ;
    +Pl      :^WG^UU   nom_t           ;
    +Pl      :^WG^TJ   nom_t           ;
    !+Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2     gen_Vn          ; ! vuossiin, ei vuottiin, hirssiin
    +Pl+Dial/Jok:%>i2     gen_tten        ; !hirssitten, vuossitten
    +Pl+Dial/Var:^E2I%>i2 gen_tten        ; !hirssitten, vuossitten
    !+Pl+Dial/Por:%>i2     par_V           ; ! hirssii
    +Pl+Dial/Jok:%>i2     par_A           ; ! hirsiä
    +Pl+Dial/Var:^E2I%>i2 par_A           ; ! hirsiä
    +Pl      :^HMETA   ill_hiin        ;
    +Pl      :^E2I%>i2 ess_nA          ;
    +Pl      :^E2I%>i2 com_ne          ;
    +Pl      :^E2I%>i2 sgpl_cases_even ; ! the same affix in sg and pl
    
LEXICON n_12_vuosi      !!= @CODE@ vuosi, vuona 
+N+Dial/Por:^Por     x_12_vuosi ;
+N+Dial/Var:te^Var   x_12_si_var ;
+N+Dial/Jok:^Jok     x_12_vuosi ;


LEXICON x_12_vuosi      !!= @CODE@
  +Sg      :si         nom_end         ;
  +Sg      :đe         gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg      :t          par_tA          ; ! parsg
  +Sg      :te^HMETA   ill_hVVn        ;
  +Sg      :           ess_nA          ;
  +Sg      :te         ess_nA          ; 
  +Sg+Err/Orth:        ess_nnA         ;
  +Sg      :đe         sgpl_cases_even ; ! these two lexica for cases with

  +Pl      :đe         nom_t           ;
  +Pl      :ss%>i2  gen_Vn          ; ! vuossiin, ei vuottiin
  +Pl      :ss%>i2  par_V           ; ! vuossii
  +Pl      :s          ill_hiin        ;
  +Pl      :s%>i2      ess_nA          ;
  +Pl      :s%>i2      com_ne          ;
  +Pl      :s%>i2      sgpl_cases_even ; ! the same affix in sg and pl


LEXICON n_12_kusi        !!= @CODE@ kusi kuusi
+N         : x_12_kusi ;

LEXICON x_12_kusi        !!= @CODE@ kusi kuusi
  +Sg      :e^E2I       nom_end         ; ! ^EI e to i
  +Sg      :e^E2I       nom_R           ; ! ^EI e to i
  +Sg      :e^WG        gen_n_sg        ;
  +Sg      :e           gen_n_sg        ; ! should be ^WG?
  +Sg      :            par_tA          ; ! kuusta kusta
  +Sg      :e^HMETA     ill_hVVn        ; ! e is for vowel copying, then e:0
  +Sg      :e           ess_nA          ;
  +Sg      :e^WG        sgpl_cases_even ; !! these two lexica for cases with

  +Pl      :e^WG        nom_t           ;
  +Pl      :             gen_ten         ; ! kusten
  +Pl+Dial/Por:s%>i2%>i     gen_n           ; !
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:e%>i2        gen_tten        ; ! lasitten
  +Pl+Dial/Var:e%>i2        gen_tten        ; ! lasitten
  +Pl+Dial/Por:s%>i2%>i     par_end         ; !
  +Pl+Dial/Jok:e%>i2%>      par_A           ; !
  +Pl+Dial/Var:e%>i2%>      par_A           ; !
  +Pl      :^EDEL       ill_hiin        ;
  +Pl      :e%>i2       ess_nA          ;
  +Pl      :e%>i2        com_ne          ; ! kanskje se
  +Pl      :e^WG%>i2     sgpl_cases_even ; !! the same affix in sg and pl



LEXICON n_12_lapsi        !!= @CODE@ lapsi la
+N         : x_12_lapsi ;
