src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot !!= @CODE@
nätälumi:nätä#lu n_12_mi ;
bonuslapsi:bonus#la n_12_lapsi ;
ihmisenlapsi:ihmisen#la n_12_lapsi ;
jalkalapsi:jalka#la n_12_lapsi ;
kainulaislapsi:kainulais#la n_12_lapsi ;
koululapsi:koulu#la n_12_lapsi ;
kultalapsi:kulta#la n_12_lapsi ;
lapsenlapsi:lapsen#la n_12_lapsi ;
lapsenlapsenlapsi:lapsenlapsen#la n_12_lapsi ;
lastenlapsi:lasten#la n_12_lapsi ;
lastentaraslapsi:lastentaras#la n_12_lapsi ;
luononlapsi:luonon#la n_12_lapsi ;
opetuslapsi:opetus#la n_12_lapsi ;
orpolapsi:orpo#la n_12_lapsi ;
pikkulapsi:pikku#la n_12_lapsi ;
rippilapsi:rippi#la n_12_lapsi ;
ristilapsi:risti#la n_12_lapsi ;
ruokkolapsi:ruokko#la n_12_lapsi ;
räkälapsi:räkä#la n_12_lapsi ;
sylilapsi:syli#la n_12_lapsi ;
lapsi:la n_12_lapsi ;
riihi:riihe n_12_hi ;
ryssänlohi:ryssän#lohe n_12_hi ;
syyslohi:syys#lohe n_12_hi ;
villilohi:villi#lohe n_12_hi ;
isolohi:iso#lohe n_12_hi ;
lohi:lohe n_12_hi ;
tuohi:tuohe n_12_hi ;
lihaliemi:liha#lie n_12_mi ;
lammasliemi:lammas#lie n_12_mi ;
liemi:lie n_12_mi ;
hiisi:hite n_12_si ;
matalavesi:matala#vete n_12_si ;
fiervavesi:fierva#vete n_12_si ;
jokivesi:joki#vete n_12_si ;
jäävesi:jää#vete n_12_si ;
köölivesi:kööli#vete n_12_si ;
lokavesi:loka#vete n_12_si ;
ullivesi:ulli#vete n_12_si ;
ullivesi+Err/Orth:ullovete n_12_si ;
merivesi:meri#vete n_12_si ;
saivovesi:saivo#vete n_12_si ;
sokkuvesi:sokku#vete n_12_si ;
sumppuvesi:sumppu#vete n_12_si ;
nousuvesi:nousu#vete n_12_si ;
vanavesi:vana#vete n_12_si ;
vesi:vete n_12_si ;
marraskesi:marras#kete n_12_si ;
kesi:kete n_12_si ;
reisi:reite n_12_si ;
onsi:onte n_12_si ;
pöyđänkansi:pöyđän#kante n_12_si ;
taivhaankansi:taivhaan#kante n_12_si ;
kansi:kante n_12_si ;
kynsi:kynte n_12_si ;
länsi:länte n_12_si ;
tosi:tote n_12_si ;
karkkausvuosi:karkkaus#vuote n_12_si ;
katovuosi:kato#vuote n_12_si ;
kielivuosi:kieli#vuote n_12_si ;
kouluinternaattivuosi:kouluinternaatti#vuote n_12_si ;
nälkävuosi:nälkä#vuote n_12_si ;
nöyrävuosi:nöyrä#vuote n_12_si ;
loppuvuosi:loppu#vuote n_12_si ;
syntymävuosi:syntymä#vuote n_12_si ;
tottuusvuosi:tottuus#vuote n_12_si ;
uusivuosi:uusi#vuote n_12_si ;
vapaavuosi:vapaa#vuote n_12_si ;
vuosi:vuo n_12_vuosi ;
jokivarsi:joki#varte n_12_si ;
käsivarsi:käsi#varte n_12_si ;
luuđanvarsi:luuđan#varte n_12_si ;
saaphaanvarsi:saaphaan#varte n_12_si ;
kirvheenvarsi:kirvheen#varte n_12_si ;
kirvesvarsi:kirves#varte n_12_si ;
vikaattheenvarsi:vikaattheen#varte n_12_si ;
vikattheenvarsi:vikattheen#varte n_12_si ;
vienovarsi:vieno#varte n_12_si ;
varsi:varte n_12_si ;
puhheenparsi:puhheen#parte n_12_si ;
sananparsi:sanan#parte n_12_si ;
parsi:parte n_12_si ;
hirsi:hirte n_12_si ;
jouluvirsi:joulu#virte n_12_si ;
virsi:virte n_12_si ;
orsi:orte n_12_si ;
kivikausi:kivi#kaute n_12_si ;
kesäkuukausi:kesä#kuukaute n_12_si ;
vähenyskuukausi:vähenys#kuukaute n_12_si ;
kuukausi:kuukaute n_12_si ;
jääkausi:jää#kaute n_12_si ;
rautakausi:rauta#kaute n_12_si ;
vuorokausi:vuoro#kaute n_12_si ;
vuosikausi:vuosi#kaute n_12_si ;
kausi:kaute n_12_si ;
susi:sute n_12_si ;
köysi:köyte n_12_si ;
kumokäsi:kumo#käte n_12_si ;
käsi:käte n_12_si ; !!= * @CODE@
taimi:tai n_12_mi ;
suolalohi:suola#lohe n_12_hi ;
taraslohi:taras#lohe n_12_hi ;
savvulohi:savvu#lohe n_12_hi ;
hevoisloimi:hevois#loi n_12_mi ;
loimi:loi n_12_mi ;
erityistoimi:erityis#toi n_12_mi ;
hakematoimi:hakema#toi n_12_mi ;
kauppatoimi:kauppa#toi n_12_mi ;
nykytoimi:nyky#toi n_12_mi ;
paranustoimi:paranus#toi n_12_mi ;
rekryteeraustoimi:rekryteeraus#toi n_12_mi ;
revitaliseeraamistoimi:revitaliseeraamis#toi n_12_mi ;
revitaliseeraustoimi:revitaliseeraus#toi n_12_mi ;
ruvanlaittamatoimi:ruvan#laittama#toi n_12_mi ;
suojatoimi:suoja#toi n_12_mi ;
turvettoimi:turvet#toi n_12_mi ;
yhtheistoimi:yhtheistoi n_12_mi ;
toimi:toi n_12_mi ;
sysi:syte n_12_si ;
kusi:kus n_12_kusi ;
jousi:jous n_12_kusi ;
marjakuusi:marja#kuus n_12_kusi ;
kuusi:kuus n_12_kusi ;
kernilumi:kerni#lu n_12_mi ;
pakkaslumi:pakkas#lu n_12_mi ;
lumi:lu n_12_mi ; !!= * @CODE@
